Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0591.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) A person, including, but not limited to, a health club owner, operator, or employee, does not have a duty to render emergency service to an individual using an AED that a health club has on the premises. (2) This act does not limit the applicability of 1963 PA 17, MCL 691.1501 to 691.1507.691.1508. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 590 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.